Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
ARTICLE 25
ADMINISTRATION

Cross references:

(1) For the constitutional provision which establishes limitations on spending, the imposition of taxes, and the incurring of debt, see section 20 of article X of the Colorado constitution.

(2) For definitions applicable to this article, see § 30-26-301 (2)(d).

Section

PART 1 FISCAL PROCEDURES

PART 2 LIMITATION OF LEVY

PART 3 IMPACT ASSISTANCE GRANTS